Massachusetts, session 194th, S48.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 29C of chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the words "visual reproduction" the following words:- ", including visual material
produced by digitization".
SECTION 2. Section 31 of said chapter of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting before the definition of “dissemination” the following definition:-
“Digitization”, the creation or alteration of visual material including, but not limited to,
through the use of computer-generated images, in a manner that would appear to a reasonable
person to depict a minor.
SECTION 3. Said section of said chapter is hereby further amended by inserting, at the
end of the definition of "visual material", the following sentence:- The term "visual material"
shall include visual material produced by digitization.
of 1